District of Columbia statutes.
8-1841.01

Definitions.

For the purposes of this subchapter, the term “commercial guard dog” means any dog trained to guard, protect, patrol, or defend any commercial premises.

Dec. 5, 2008, D.C. Law 17-281, § 401, 55 DCR 9186